src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-vanas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - vanas: # N_ODD_WG (with CGrad)
    vanas+N+Sg+Nom: [vanas, vanás]
    vanas+N+Sg+Gen: [vadnasa, vadnása]
    vanas+N+Sg+Acc: [vadnasav, vadnásav]
    vanas+N+Sg+Ill: [vadnasij, vadnásij]
    vanas+N+Sg+Ine: [vadnasin, vadnásin]
    vanas+N+Sg+Ela: [vadnasist, vadnásis]
    vanas+N+Sg+Com: [vadnasijn, vadnásijn]
    vanas+N+Pl+Nom: [vadnasa, vadnása]
    vanas+N+Pl+Gen: [vadnasij, vadnásij]
    vanas+N+Pl+Acc: [vadnasijt, vadnásijt]
    vanas+N+Pl+Ill: [vadnasijda, vadnásijda]
    vanas+N+Pl+Ine: [vadnasijn, vadnásijn]
    vanas+N+Pl+Ela: [vadnasijst, vadnásijs]
    vanas+N+Pl+Com: [vadnasij, vadnasijgum, vadnásij, vadnásijgum]
    vanas+N+Ess: [vadnasin, vadnásin]
    vanas+N+Abe: [vadnasahtá, vadnásahtá]


    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [vadnasatj, vadnásatj]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: [vadnasatja, vadnásatja]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: [vadnasatjav, vadnásatjav]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: [vadnasatjij, vadnásatjij]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ine: [vadnasatjin, vadnásatjin]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ela: [vadnasatjist, vadnásatjis]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: [vadnasatjijn, vadnásatjijn]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: [vadnasatja, vadnásatja]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: [vadnasatjij, vadnásatjij]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: [vadnasatjijt, vadnásatjijt]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: [vadnasatjijda, vadnásatjijda]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine: [vadnasatjijn, vadnásatjijn]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela: [vadnasatjijst, vadnásatjijs]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: [vadnasatjij, vadnasatjijgum, vadnásatjij, vadnásatjijgum]
    vanas+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: [vadnasatjin, vadnásatjin]
 
